District of Columbia statutes.
31-3514

Repealed

Open enrollment.

Repealed.

Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-245, § 15, 44 DCR 1158
June 11, 2004, D.C. Law 15-166, § 4(u)(3), 51 DCR 2817
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5012(b), 53 DCR 6899
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-369, § 2(f), 56 DCR 1346
Feb. 4, 2010, D.C. Law 18-104, § 2(e), 56 DCR 9182
Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 5023(b), 57 DCR 6242
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 88(b), 59 DCR 6190
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-265, § 105(d), 62 DCR 1529
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated previously made technical corrections.
D.C. Law 18-223, in subsec. (j)(2), substituted “Healthy DC and Health Care Expansion Fund” for “Healthy DC Fund”.
D.C. Law 18-104 added subsecs. (p), (q) and (r).
D.C. Law 17-369, in subsec. (j)(2), substituted “shall order annually an independent” for “may order an independent”; rewrote subsec. (k); and added subsecs. (m), (n), and (o).
D.C. Law 16-192 repealed subsec. (f) and rewrote subsecs. (j) and (k).
D.C. Law 15-166, in par. (3) of subsec. (j), substituted “Department of Insurance, Securities, and Banking” for “Department of Insurance and Securities Regulation” both times it appears.
1981 Ed., § 35-4714.
This section is referenced in § 31-205, § 31-3501, § 31-3505, § 31-3506, § 31-3508, § 31-3512, and § 47-2608.